Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB239.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.1415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a school council or, if none exists, the principal adopts a curriculum for human
sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases, instruction shall include but not be
limited to the following content:
(a) Abstinence from sexual activity is the desirable goal for all school-age
children;
(b) Abstinence from sexual activity is the only certain way to avoid unintended
pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and other associated health
problems;
(c) The best way to avoid sexually transmitted diseases and other associated
health problems is to establish a permanent mutually faithful monogamous
relationship;
(d) [A policy to respect parental rights by ensuring that:
1. Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, children in grade
five (5) and below do not receive any instruction through curriculum or
programs on human sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases; or
2. Any child, regardless of grade level, enrolled in the district does not
receive any instruction or presentation that has a goal or purpose of
students studying or exploring gender identity, gender expression, or
sexual orientation; and
(e) ]A policy to notify a parent [in advance and obtain the parent's written consent
]before the parent's child in grade six (6) or above receives any instruction
through curriculum or programs on human sexuality or sexually transmitted
diseases authorized in this section. The notice shall inform the parent of how
to opt their child out of the instruction.
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
(2) Any course, curriculum, or program offered by a public school on the subject of
human sexuality provided by school personnel or by third parties authorized by the
school shall:
(a) Provide an alternative course, curriculum, or program without any penalty to
the student's grade or standing for students whose parents have opted their
child out of instruction in accordance with subsection (1)(d) of this
section[not provided written consent as required in subsection (1)(e) of this
section];
(b) Be subject to an inspection by parents of participating students that allows
parents to review the following materials:
1. Curriculum;
2. Instructional materials;
3. Lesson plans;
4. Assessments or tests;
5. Surveys or questionnaires;
6. Assignments; and
7. Instructional activities;
(c) Be developmentally appropriate; and
(d) Be limited to a curriculum that has been subject to the reasonable review and
response by stakeholders in conformity with this subsection and KRS
160.345(2).
(3) A public school offering any course, curriculum, or program on the subject of
human sexuality shall provide notification to the parents of a student at least two (2)
weeks prior to the student's planned participation in the course, curriculum, or
program. The notification shall:
(a) Inform the parents of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Provide the date the course, curriculum, or program is scheduled to begin;
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
(c) Detail the process for a parent to review the materials outlined in subsection
(2) of this section;
(d) Explain the process for a parent to opt out of[provide written consent] for the
student's participation in the course, curriculum, or program; and
(e) Provide the contact information for the teacher or instructor of the course,
curriculum, or program and a school administrator designated with oversight.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit school personnel from:
(a) Discussing human sexuality, including the sexuality of any historic person,
group, or public figure, where the discussion provides necessary context in
relation to a topic of instruction from a curriculum approved pursuant to KRS
160.345;
(b) Providing age-appropriate instruction on child sexual abuse through
curriculum or programs in accordance with the standards set forth by the
National Children's Alliance and approved by the Children's Advocacy
Centers of Kentucky, regardless of grade level; or
(c) Responding to a question from a student during class regarding human
sexuality as it relates to a topic of instruction from a curriculum approved
pursuant to KRS 160.345.
Section 2. KRS 158.191 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "External health care provider" means a provider of health or mental health
services that is not employed by or contracted with the school district to
provide services to the district's students;
(b) "Health services" has the same meaning as in KRS 156.502;
(c) "Mental health services" means services provided by a school-based mental
health services provider as defined in KRS 158.4416 but shall not include
academic or career counseling; and
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
(d) "Parent" means a person who has legal custody or control of the student such
as a mother, father, or guardian.
(2) Upon a student's enrollment and at the beginning of each school year, the district
shall provide a notification to the student's parents listing each of the health services
and mental health services related to human sexuality, contraception, or family
planning available at the student's school and of the parents' right to withhold
consent or decline any of those specific services. A parent's consent to a health
service or mental health service under this subsection shall not waive the parent's
right to access the student's educational or health records held by the district or the
notifications required under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) [Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, ]As part of a school district's
effort to provide a safe and supportive learning environment for students, a school
shall notify a student's parents if:
(a) The school changes the health services or mental health services related to
human sexuality, contraception, or family planning that it provides, and shall
obtain parental consent prior to providing health services or mental health
services to the student; and[or]
(b) School personnel make a referral:
1. For the student to receive a school's health services or mental health
services; or
2. To an external health care provider, for which parental consent shall be
obtained prior to the referral being made.
(4) School districts and district personnel shall respect the rights of parents to make
decisions regarding the upbringing and control of the student through procedures
encouraging students to discuss mental or physical health or life issues with their
parents or through facilitating the discussion with their parents.
(5) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education or the Kentucky Department of Education
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
shall not require or recommend that a local school district keep any student
information confidential from a student's parents. A district or school shall not
adopt policies or procedures with the intent of keeping any student
information confidential from parents.
(b) [The Kentucky Board of Education or the Kentucky Department of Education
shall not require or recommend policies or procedures for the use of pronouns
that do not conform to a student's biological sex as indicated on the student's
original, unedited birth certificate issued at the time of birth pursuant to KRS
156.070(2)(g)2.
(c) ]A local school district shall request[not require] school personnel and[or]
students to use gender-appropriate pronouns for a child when a parent has
submitted a request to do so to the school principal along with a note from a
medical provider diagnosing the child with gender dysphoria[for students
that do not conform to that particular student's biological sex as referenced in
paragraph (b) of this subsection].
(c)[(d)] Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a school district or district
personnel from withholding information from a parent if a reasonably prudent
person would believe[, based on previous conduct and history,] that the
disclosure would result in the child becoming a dependent child or an abused
or neglected child as defined in KRS 600.020. The fact that district personnel
withhold information from a parent under this subsection shall not in itself
constitute evidence of failure to report dependency, neglect, or abuse to the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services under KRS 620.030.
(6) [Prior to a well-being questionnaire or assessment, or a health screening form being
given to a child for research purposes, a school district shall provide the student's
parent with access to review the material and shall obtain parental consent. Parental
consent shall not be a general consent to these assessments or forms but shall be
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
required for each assessment or form. A parent's refusal to consent shall not be an
indicator of having a belief regarding the topic of the assessment or form.
(7) ]Nothing in this section shall:
(a) Prohibit a school district or the district's personnel from seeking or providing
emergency medical or mental health services for a student as outlined in the
district's policies; or
(b) Remove the duty to report pursuant to KRS 620.030 if district personnel has
reasonable cause to believe the child is a dependent child or an abused or
neglected child due to the risk of physical or emotional injury identified in
KRS 600.020(1)(a)2. or as otherwise provided in that statute.
Section 3. KRS 158.189 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Biological sex" means the physical condition of being male or female, which
is determined by a person's chromosomes, and is identified at birth by a
person's anatomy; and
(b) "School" means a school under the control of a local board of education or a
charter school board of directors.
(2) The General Assembly finds that:
(a) School personnel have a duty to protect the dignity, health, welfare, and
privacy rights of students in their care;
(b) Children and young adults have natural and normal concerns about privacy
while in various states of undress, and some[most] wish for the option of
individual privacy[members of the opposite biological sex not to be present]
in those circumstances;
(c) Allowing students to use restrooms, locker rooms, or shower rooms while
denied individual privacy[that are reserved for students of a different
biological sex]:
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
1. Will create a significant potential for disruption of school activities and
unsafe conditions; and
2. Will create potential embarrassment, shame, and psychological injury to
students;
(d) Parents have a reasonable expectation that schools will not require[allow]
minor children to be viewed in various states of undress[ by members of the
opposite biological sex, nor allow minor children to view members of the
opposite sex in various states of undress]; and
(e) Schools have a duty to respect and protect the privacy rights of students,
including the right not to be compelled to undress or be unclothed without
having individual privacy[in the presence of members of the opposite
biological sex].
(3) Each local board of education or charter school board of directors shall, after
allowing public comment on the issue at an open meeting, adopt policies necessary
to protect the privacy rights outlined in subsection (2) of this section and enforce
this subsection. Those policies shall, at a minimum, [not ]allow all students the
right to individual privacy in the[to] use of restrooms, locker rooms, or shower
rooms regardless of biological sex or gender identity[that are reserved for students
of a different biological sex].
(4) (a) A student whose parent has submitted a request for accommodation[ who
asserts] to school officials for[that] his or her child whose gender is different
from his or her biological sex along with a note from a medical provider
diagnosing the child with gender dysphoria[and whose parent or legal
guardian provides written consent to school officials] shall be provided with
the best available accommodation that ensures individual privacy for the
child in[, but that accommodation shall not include] the use of school
restrooms, locker rooms, or shower rooms[ designated for use by students of
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
the opposite biological sex while students of the opposite biological sex are
present or could be present].
(b) Acceptable alternate accommodations implemented by the school upon the
parent's request may include but are not limited to access to single-stall
restrooms or controlled use of faculty bathrooms, locker rooms, or shower
rooms. Each local board of education shall adopt policies and procedures to
enforce this section.
Section 4. KRS 311.372 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person shall not provide any:
(a) Surgical medical treatment to a child under the age of eighteen (18) years
for gender dysphoria; or
(b) Nonsurgical medical treatment to a child under the age of eighteen (18)
years for gender dysphoria without the written consent of the child's parent
or legal guardian.
(2) Any nonsurgical medical treatment provided to a child under the age of eighteen
(18) years for gender dysphoria shall:
(a) Be provided only to a child who has a medical diagnosis of gender
dysphoria by a mental health care provider licensed in Kentucky;
(b) Be provided by a health care provider who is appropriately trained and
experienced in providing nonsurgical medical treatments for children with
gender dysphoria in collaboration with a clinical psychologist or
psychiatrist;
(c) Be limited to appropriate nonsurgical medical treatments for children with
gender dysphoria that:
1. May include reversible puberty-blocking drugs approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration for adolescents that are used to
stop luteinizing hormone and follicle stimulating hormone secretion,
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
synthetic antiandrogen drugs used to block the androgen receptor, or
any other drug used to delay or suppress pubertal development; and
2. Shall not include cross-sex hormones, including testosterone,
estrogen, or other androgens given to a person in amounts that are
larger or more potent than would normally occur naturally in a
healthy person of the same age and sex;
(d) Meet evidence-based medical standards of care for the treatment of children
with gender dysphoria; and
(e) Include mental health services[
As used in this section:
(a) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen (18) years; and
(b) "Sex" means the biological indication of male and female as evidenced by sex
chromosomes, naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous
internal and external genitalia present at birth.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a health care provider shall not,
for the purpose of attempting to alter the appearance of, or to validate a minor's
perception of, the minor's sex, if that appearance or perception is inconsistent with
the minor's sex, knowingly:
(a) Prescribe or administer any drug to delay or stop normal puberty;
(b) Prescribe or administer testosterone, estrogen, or progesterone, in amounts
greater than would normally be produced endogenously in a healthy person of
the same age and sex;
(c) Perform any sterilizing surgery, including castration, hysterectomy,
oophorectomy, orchiectomy, penectomy, and vasectomy;
(d) Perform any surgery that artificially constructs tissue having the appearance
of genitalia differing from the minor's sex, including metoidioplasty,
phalloplasty, and vaginoplasty; or
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
(e) Remove any healthy or non-diseased body part or tissue.
(3) The prohibitions of subsection (2) of this section shall not limit or restrict the
provision of services to:
(a) A minor born with a medically verifiable disorder of sex development,
including external biological sex characteristics that are irresolvably
ambiguous;
(b) A minor diagnosed with a disorder of sexual development, if a health care
provider has determined, through genetic or biochemical testing, that the
minor does not have a sex chromosome structure, sex steroid hormone
production, or sex steroid hormone action, that is normal for a biological male
or biological female; or
(c) A minor needing treatment for an infection, injury, disease, or disorder that
has been caused or exacerbated by any action or procedure prohibited by
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If a licensing or certifying agency for health care providers finds, in accordance
with each agency's disciplinary and hearing process, that a health care provider who
is licensed or certified by the agency has violated subsection (2) of this section, the
agency shall revoke the health care provider's licensure or certification.
(5) Any civil action to recover damages for injury suffered as a result of a violation of
subsection (2) of this section may be commenced before the later of:
(a) The date on which the person reaches the age of thirty (30) years; or
(b) Within three (3) years from the time the person discovered or reasonably
should have discovered that the injury or damages were caused by the
violation.
(6) If a health care provider has initiated a course of treatment for a minor that includes
the prescription or administration of any drug or hormone prohibited by subsection
(2) of this section, and if the health care provider determines and documents in the
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 375
minor's medical record that immediately terminating the minor's use of the drug or
hormone would cause harm to the minor, the health care provider may institute a
period during which the minor's use of the drug or hormone is systematically
reduced].
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 12/30/2025 10:21 AM Jacketed